Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.050

Transfer authorized by will or trust.

(1) A personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer pursuant to RCW 11.114.090 to a custodian for the benefit of a minor as authorized in the governing will or trust. The personal representative or trustee may designate himself or herself as custodian provided he or she falls within the class of persons eligible to serve as custodian under RCW 11.114.090(1).

(2) If the testator or grantor has nominated a custodian under RCW 11.114.030 to receive the custodial property, the transfer shall be made to that person.

(3) If the testator or grantor has not nominated a custodian under RCW 11.114.030, or all persons so nominated as custodian die before the transfer or are unable, decline, or are ineligible to serve, the personal representative or the trustee, as the case may be, shall designate the custodian from among those eligible to serve as custodian for property of that kind under RCW 11.114.090(1). The personal representative or trustee may designate himself or herself as custodian, provided he or she falls within the class of persons eligible to serve as custodian under RCW 11.114.090(1).

[ 1991 c 193 s 5.]